Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.280

Assessment where bonds issued—Payment in cash during installment period—Duties of county treasurer—Use of funds.

The owners of any lot, tract, or parcel of land may save the same from all liability for the unpaid amount of the assessment, at any time after the thirty-day period herein provided for their payment without interest, by paying the entire amount or all installments on said assessment together with all interest due to the date of maturity of any installment next falling due. All such payments shall be made to the county treasurer whose duty it shall be to collect all assessments under this chapter and all sums so paid or collected shall be applied solely to the payment of the cost and expense of the district and payment of principal and/or interest of any bonds issued.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.280. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 28.]